Utah statutes.
53A-8a-702.   Evaluation of school and district administrators.

The State Board of Education shall:

(1)  establish in rules a framework for the evaluation of school and district administrators that includes the following components:

(a)  student achievement indicators emphasizing learning growth and proficiency;

(b)  the results of an evaluation tool utilized by the local school board that includes input from employees, parents, and students;

(c)  the effectiveness of evaluating employee performance in a school or district for which the school or district administrator has responsibility; and

(d)  other factors as determined by a local school board in implementing state law and State Board of Education rules; and

(2)  require each school district to fully implement an evaluation system for school and district administrators in accordance with the framework established by the State Board of Education no later than the 2014-15 school year.



Enacted by Chapter 425, 2012 General Session

